Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.426

Grain indemnity fund program—Annual assessments—Limitations.

The assessments imposed pursuant to RCW 22.09.416 shall be imposed annually, under rules promulgated by the department, until such time as the grain indemnity fund balance, less any outstanding claims, reaches three million dollars. For any year in which the grain indemnity fund balance, less any outstanding claims, exceeds three million dollars on the annual assessment date, no assessment shall be imposed by the department, except as provided in RCW 22.09.421(3) or 22.09.431.

[ 1987 c 509 s 11.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 509: See note following RCW 22.09.060.